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DTC C 1249 / 49 Stop Light Switch Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1249 /49
ECUterminal IG 1 voltage is9.5 to 17.2VandABSis in
non−operation, theopencircuit instop lightswitchcircuit
continues for 0.3 sec. or more.

Stop lightswitchcircuit
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check operation of the stop light switch.

CHECK:
Check that the stop light lights up when brake pedal is depressed and turns OFF when the brake pedal is
released.

OK Go to step 3.

NG

2 Check stop light circuit (See Pub. No. RM616E on page BE−58).

NG Repair or replace stop light circuit.

OK

3 Check voltage between terminal STP of ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
Remove ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU with connectors still con-
nected.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal STP of ABS & BA & TRC &
VSC ECU and body ground when brake pedal is depressed.
OK:

Voltage: 10 − 14 V

OK Proceed to next circuit inspection shown in
problem symptoms chart (See page DI−23).

NG
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4 Check for open circuit in harness and connector between ABS & BA & TRC &
VSC ECU and stop light switch (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.


